California statutes. Education Code
(a) Simultaneous with the execution of the lease financing authorized pursuant to Section 41329.52, the bank shall provide to the Controller and the school district a notification of its lease financing. The notice shall include a schedule of rent payments to become due to the bank from the school district and the bond trustee. The Controller shall make the apportionment to the bond trustee of those amounts on the dates shown on the schedule. The bank may further authorize the apportionments to be used to pay or reimburse the provider of any credit enhancement of bonds and other ongoing or periodic ancillary costs of the bond financing issued by the bank in connection with this article. If the amount of rent payments vary from the schedule as a result of variable interest rates on the
 bonds, early redemptions, or changes in expenses, the bank shall amend or supplement the schedule accordingly.

(b) Except where financing is for a community college district, the Controller shall make the apportionment only from moneys in Section A of the State School Fund and the Education Protection Account designated for apportionment to the district and any apportionment authorized pursuant to this subdivision shall constitute a lien senior to any other apportionment or payment of State School Fund and the Education Protection Account moneys to or for that district not made pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) If financing is for the Compton Community College District, the Controller shall make the apportionment only from moneys in Section B of the State School Fund. Any apportionment authorized pursuant to this subdivision shall constitute a lien senior to any other
 apportionment or payment of Section B State School Fund moneys.

(d) The amount apportioned for a school district pursuant to this section is an allocation to the school district for purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. For purposes of computing the local control funding formula allocation pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, for any school district, the local control funding formula allocation for any fiscal year in which funds are apportioned for the school district pursuant to this section shall include any amounts apportioned by the Controller pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), and Section 41329.57.

(e) No party, including the school district or any of its creditors, shall have any claim to the money apportioned or to be apportioned to the bond trustee by the Controller pursuant to this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 19, Sec. 35.   (SB 78)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

41329.56.

(a) Chapter 57 of the Statutes of 1993 consolidated several previous emergency apportionments and a loan to the West Contra Costa Unified School District and specified the repayment terms of that apportionment. Chapter 14 of the Statutes of 2003 authorized an emergency apportionment to the Oakland Unified School District and specified the repayment terms of that apportionment. Collectively these are referred to in this section as “existing apportionments.”

(b) Promptly after August 23, 2004, the bank shall issue separate bonds for the West Contra Costa Unified School District and the Oakland Unified School District for lease financing pursuant to Section 41329.52. The school districts shall use the proceeds to repay the existing apportionments. The terms of the leases shall not exceed 20 years, except that if at the end of the lease term any rent payable is not fully paid, or if the rent payable has been abated, the term of the lease shall be extended for a period not to exceed 10 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 97, Sec. 3.   Effective July 21, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

41329.57.

(a) (1) Pursuant to a schedule provided to the Controller by the bank, the Controller shall transfer from Section A of the State School Fund and the Education Protection Account the amount of funds necessary to pay the warrants issued pursuant to paragraph (2) so that the effective cost of the lease financing provided to the Oakland Unified School District, the Vallejo City Unified School District, and the West Contra Costa Unified School District pursuant to this article shall be equal to the cost of the original General Fund emergency loan made to each school district.

(A) For purposes of determining the cost of the original emergency loan for the West
 Contra Costa Unified School District, the original interest rate is the rate established pursuant to Section 41474 of 1.532 percent.

(B) For purposes of determining the cost of the original emergency loan for the Oakland Unified School District, the original interest rate is 1.778 percent. This rate shall also apply to any disbursements of the loan pursuant to Chapter 14 of the Statutes of 2003 that are subsequent to August 23, 2004.

(C) For purposes of determining the cost of the original emergency loan for the Vallejo City Unified School District, the original interest rate is 1.5 percent. This rate shall also apply to any disbursements of the loan pursuant to Chapter 53 of the Statutes of 2004 that are subsequent to August 23, 2004.

(2) The executive director or chair of the bank shall periodically provide a
 schedule to the Controller and each school district of the actual amount of the difference between the cost of the lease financing compared to the cost of the original emergency loan for each school district for each year and the Controller shall issue warrants to each school district pursuant to the schedule. Payments to a school district shall occur only during the term of the loan for that district and shall be made no sooner than the corresponding payments are made to the bond trustee under the lease financing for that district.

(3) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the warrants issued pursuant to paragraph (2) are “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 for the fiscal years in which the warrants are issued and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts
 from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal years in which the warrants are issued.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the financing cost subsidies funded in this section not be deemed precedent nor in conflict with Section 41329.53, as these school districts requested loans before the enactment of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 48, Sec. 31.   (AB 86)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

41329.575.

(a) (1) Pursuant to a schedule provided to the Controller by the bank, commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, the Controller shall transfer from Section A of the State School Fund and the Education Protection Account the amount of funds necessary to pay the warrants issued pursuant to paragraph (3) so that the effective cost of the lease financing for each fiscal year from 2013–14 to 2029–30, inclusive, provided to the South Monterey County Joint Union High School District pursuant to Chapter 20 of the Statutes of 2009 shall be equal to the cost of providing an emergency General Fund cashflow loan to the South Monterey County Joint Union High School District for each fiscal year from 2013–14 to 2029–30, inclusive.

(2) For purposes of determining the cost of providing an emergency General Fund cashflow loan to the South Monterey County Joint Union High School District for fiscal years 2013–14 to 2029–30, inclusive, for the South Monterey County Joint Union High School District, the original interest rate is equal to the annual rate of return earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account for the applicable fiscal year, plus an additional 2 percent. This rate shall also apply to disbursements of the loan pursuant to Chapter 20 of the Statutes of 2009 that are subsequent to September 15, 2013.

(3) The executive director or chair of the bank shall periodically provide a schedule to the Controller and the South Monterey County Joint Union High School District of the actual amount of the difference between the annual cost of the lease financing compared to the annual cost of providing the South Monterey
 County Joint Union High School District with an emergency General Fund cashflow loan for each applicable fiscal year and the Controller shall issue warrants to the South Monterey County Joint Union High School District pursuant to the schedule. Payments to the South Monterey County Joint Union High School District shall occur only during the term of the loan for the South Monterey County Joint Union High School District and shall be made no sooner than the corresponding payments are made to the bond trustee under the lease financing for the South Monterey County Joint Union High School District.

(4) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the warrants issued pursuant to paragraph (3) are “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 for the fiscal years in which the warrants are issued and included within the “total
 allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal years in which the warrants are issued.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the financing cost subsidies funded in this section not be deemed precedent nor in conflict with Chapter 20 of the Statutes of 2009.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 34.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

41329.58.

The sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) is hereby appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for apportionment to the Compton Community College District as an emergency apportionment to finance, among other things, the activities described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 74292) of Chapter 5 of Part 46.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 50, Sec. 8.   Effective June 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

41329.59.

(a) On or before October 30, 2006, the Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team (FCMAT) shall conduct an extraordinary audit of the Compton Community College District, to be delivered to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and the Director of Finance, focused upon an examination of alleged fraud, misappropriation of funds, or other illegal fiscal practices. The audit shall be conducted in a timely and efficient manner.

(b) On or before January 31, 2007, the FCMAT shall conduct a comprehensive assessment and prepare a recovery plan, to be delivered to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and the Department of Finance, for the
 Compton Community College District addressing the five operational areas: financial management, academic achievement, personnel management, facilities management, and governance/community relations.

(c) The FCMAT shall file a written status report at regular intervals with the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature, the advisory committee to the special trustee, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, the Director of Finance, and the Governor. The status reports shall include the progress that the Compton Community College District is making in meeting the recommendations of the FCMAT comprehensive assessment and addressing the deficiencies identified by the Accrediting Commission for Community and Junior Colleges.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an amount of up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) shall be provided
 to the Compton Community College District from any funds budgeted for FCMAT in Item 6110-107-0001 of Section 2.00 of the annual Budget Act or any other funds available from prior budget years for FCMAT for the purpose of funding the audit described in subdivision (a) of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 349, Sec. 1.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

41329.60.

Notwithstanding any other law, beginning July 1, 2016, the interest rate on any outstanding General Fund emergency apportionments made to the Compton Community College District pursuant to Section 41329.52 or 41329.58 shall be 2.307 percent. All other terms of those emergency apportionments shall remain the same.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 13.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Disbursements by Superintendent of Public Instruction [41330. - 41344.6.]

41330.

Commencing with the 2003–04 fiscal year, for the purposes of allocating the advance apportionment for the current fiscal year, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall on or before July 20th of each year certify to the Controller the amounts estimated to be apportioned to each effective school district for the current fiscal year on the basis of the report of the districts for the second principal apportionment of the preceding fiscal year, the amounts estimated to be apportioned to each county school tuition fund and to each county school service fund for schools and classes to be maintained by the county superintendent of schools during the current fiscal year on the basis of reports provided by the county superintendent of schools, and the amounts estimated by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to be apportioned to the county school service fund during the current fiscal year under subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 14054.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 5.   Effective March 18, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

41332.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, on or before February 20th of each year, apportion to each elementary school district, high school district, county school service fund, and county school tuition fund the total amounts allowed to them under Sections 14054, 14057, 14058, 41790, 41800, 41810, 41811, 41840, 41841, 41863, 41866, 41882, 41884, 41885, 41886, 41888, 41950, 41970, 41971, 42004, 42005, 42054, 42055, 42056, and 52205, whichever are in effect. This apportionment shall be called the first principal apportionment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 195.)
-------------------------------------------

41333.

For purposes of determining the eligibility of a school for the “necessary small school” foundation program, if by November 10th of any current fiscal year, an additional teacher or teachers are hired in elementary schools or high schools such teachers shall be deemed to have been hired as of the beginning of the school year, and the districts shall, if otherwise eligible, be entitled to the appropriate small school foundation programs for purposes of computation of the principal apportionments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41335.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall on or before July 2 of each year apportion to each elementary school district, high school district, county school service fund, and county school tuition fund the total amounts allowed to each respective district or fund, as would have been apportioned on June 25 of the fiscal year of the apportionment pursuant to Section 41335 as it read on May 30, 2003, under Sections 14054, 14057, 14058, 41790, 41800, 41810, 41811, 41840, 41841, 41863, 41866, 41882, 41884, 41885, 41886, 41888, 41950, 41970, 41971, 42004, 42005, 42054, 42055, 42056, and 52205, whichever are in effect. This apportionment shall be called the second principal apportionment.

(b) This section shall become operative on June 1, 2003.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2003, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 7.   Effective March 18, 2003.   Section operative June 1, 2003, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

41336.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall on or before June 25th of each year apportion to each school district or fund the total of the amounts allowed to the district or fund under Section 41972. This apportionment shall be called the final apportionment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41337.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall apportion at such times as needed the amounts allowed pursuant to Section 14055.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41339.

The Superintendent shall certify each apportionment made by him or her under Sections 41332 to 41340, inclusive, whichever are in effect, to the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 42.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

41339.1.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 41339, 10 working days prior to the dates prescribed in Section 41330 and Section 41335, as Section 41335 reads on and after June 1, 2003, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the Department of Finance of the average daily attendance numbers and the local property tax revenues to be utilized in the respective certification.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 8.   Effective March 18, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

41339.2.

Commencing with the first fiscal year after subdivision (g) of Section 42238.03 applies, the Superintendent, within three business days of the first principal, second principal, and annual apportionments for each fiscal year, shall publish on the department’s Internet Web site the amount of a county office of education’s, school district’s, or charter school’s supplemental and concentration grants calculated pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2574 or subdivisions (e) and (f) of Section 42238.02.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 28.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

41340.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall furnish an abstract of each apportionment of the State School Fund to the State Controller, the Department of Finance and to the county and city and county auditors, county and city and county treasurers, and to the county superintendents of schools of the several counties of the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41341.

(a) (1) If, during any fiscal year, the amount apportioned to a school district, county office of education, charter school, or to any fund from Section A of the State School Fund differs either positively or negatively from the amount to which the school district, county office of education, charter school, or fund was entitled by an amount equal to the local control funding formula allocation pursuant to Section 2574 or 42238.02, as implemented pursuant to Section 42238.03, for one unit of average daily attendance, the Superintendent, in accordance with regulations
 that the Superintendent is hereby authorized to adopt, not later than the first succeeding fiscal year from the fiscal year in which the computational error was made, shall withhold from, or add to, the apportionment made during that fiscal year, the amount of the excess or deficiency, as the case may be. Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, excesses withheld or deficiencies added by the Superintendent pursuant this subdivision shall be added to or allowed from any portion of the State School Fund.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), excesses may be withheld or deficiencies added to apportionments on account of audit exceptions reported in an audit or review, as described in subdivision (e) of Section 41344, or audit or review conducted by a certified public accountant or public accounting firm designated by a governmental agency that provided the local educational agency the opportunity to provide a written
 response.

(3) If, during any fiscal year, a school district, county office of education, or charter school determines that the amount apportioned to the school district, county office of education, charter school, or to any fund from Section A of the State School Fund differs either positively or negatively from the amount to which the school district, county office of education, charter school, or fund was entitled by an amount equal to the local control funding formula allocation pursuant to Section 2574 or 42238.02, as implemented pursuant to Section 42238.03, for one or more units of
 average daily attendance, the school district,
 county office of education, or charter school shall report the corrected amount to the Superintendent.

(b) If, during any fiscal year, the amount apportioned to a community college district or to any fund from Section B of the State School Fund differs either positively or negatively from the amount to which the community college district or fund was entitled, by an amount equal to the funding of one full-time equivalent student, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in accordance with regulations that the chancellor is hereby authorized to adopt, not later than the first succeeding fiscal year from the fiscal year in which the computational error was made, shall withhold from, or add to, the apportionment made during that fiscal year, the amount of the excess or deficiency, as the case may be. Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, excesses withheld or deficiencies added by the
 Chancellor of the California Community Colleges under this subdivision shall be added to or allowed from any portion of the State School Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 12.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

41342.

When any judgment has been rendered which requires the apportionment from the State School Fund to any school district, to any other agency, or to any fund for any fiscal year of more than the amount actually apportioned thereto during that fiscal year, the difference shall be apportioned to the district, agency, or fund by the Superintendent of Public Instruction from the State School Fund during the fiscal year following that in which the judgment becomes final before any other apportionment from the State School Fund is made. Upon the becoming final of any judgment which requires the apportionment from the State School Fund to any school district, to any other agency, or to any fund for any fiscal year of less than the amount actually apportioned thereto during any fiscal year, the difference shall be deducted from the apportionment made to that district, agency, or fund by the Superintendent of Public Instruction from the State School Fund during the fiscal year following that in which the judgment becomes final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

41343.

Wherever the attendance of pupils is not included in the computation of the average daily attendance of a school district for any fiscal year because the certification document of the person employed by the district to instruct such pupils was not in force during the period of such attendance, the governing board of the district may, upon payment of the salary of such person pursuant to Section 45036, or similar provisions of law, report such attendance to the Superintendent of Public Instruction during the fiscal year in which such salary is paid. Such report shall be made in such form as shall be prescribed and furnished by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. Thereafter the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall add to the apportionment from the State School Fund to the district during the next succeeding fiscal year or years, as determined by him but not exceeding three, the additional amount to which the district would have been entitled in the fiscal year next succeeding that in which such attendance was not included in the computation of the average daily attendance of the district if such amount is at least one hundred dollars ($100) or more.

Any such additional amount shall be apportioned from the State School Fund before any other apportionment from such fund is made and shall be allowed from any portion of such fund except that portion reserved as allowances for basic state aid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41344.

(a) If, as the result of an audit or review, a local educational agency is required to repay an apportionment significant audit exception or to pay a penalty arising from an audit exception, the Superintendent and the Director of Finance, or their designees, jointly shall establish a plan for repayment of state school funds that the local educational agency received on the basis of average daily attendance, or other data, that did not comply with statutory or regulatory requirements that were conditions of the apportionments, or for payment of a penalty arising from an audit exception. A local educational agency shall request a plan within 90 days of receiving the final audit report or review, within 30 days of withdrawing or receiving a final determination regarding an appeal pursuant
 to subdivision (d), or, in the absence of an appeal pursuant to subdivision (d), within 30 days of withdrawing or receiving a determination of a summary review pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 41344.1. At the time the local educational agency is notified, the Controller also shall be notified of the plan. The plan shall be established in accordance with the following:

(1) The Controller shall withhold the disallowed or penalty amount at the next principal apportionment or pursuant to paragraph (2), unless subdivision (d) of this section or subdivision (d) of Section 41344.1 applies, in which case the disallowed or penalty amount shall be withheld, at the next principal apportionment or pursuant to paragraph (2) following the determination regarding the appeal or summary appeal. In calculating a disallowed amount, the Controller shall determine the total amount of overpayment received by the local educational agency on the basis of average
 daily attendance, or other data, reported by the local educational agency that did not comply with one or more statutory or regulatory requirements that are conditions of apportionment.

(2) If the Superintendent and the Director of Finance concur that repayment of the full liability or payment of the penalty in the current fiscal year would constitute a severe financial hardship for the local educational agency, they may approve a plan of equal annual payments over a period of up to eight years. The plan shall include interest on each year’s outstanding balance at the rate earned on the state’s Pooled Money Investment Account during that year. The Superintendent and the Director of Finance jointly shall establish this plan. The Controller shall withhold amounts pursuant to the plan.

(3) If the Superintendent and the Director of Finance do not jointly establish a plan, the
 Controller shall withhold the entire disallowed amount determined pursuant to paragraph (1), or the penalty amount, at the next principal apportionment.

(b) (1) For purposes of computing average daily attendance pursuant to Section 42238.05, a local educational agency’s prior fiscal year average daily attendance shall be reduced by an amount equal to any average daily attendance disallowed in the current year, by an audit or review, as defined in subdivision (e).

(2) Commencing with the 1999–2000 fiscal year, this subdivision may not result in a local educational agency repaying more than the value of the average daily attendance disallowed in the audit exception plus interest and other penalties or reductions in apportionments as provided by existing law.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, this
 section may not be waived under any authority set forth in this code except as provided in this section or Section 41344.1.

(d) Within 60 days of the date on which a local educational agency receives a final audit report resulting from an audit or review of all or any part of the operations of the local educational agency, or within 30 days of receiving a determination of a summary review pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 41344.1, a local educational agency may appeal a finding contained in the final report, pursuant to Section 41344.1. Within 90 days of the date on which the appeal is received by the panel, a hearing shall be held at which the local educational agency may present evidence or arguments if the local educational agency believes that the final report contains any finding that was based on errors of fact or interpretation of law, or if the local educational agency believes in good faith that it was in substantial compliance
 with all legal requirements. A repayment schedule may not commence until the panel reaches a determination regarding the appeal. If the panel determines that the local educational agency is correct in its assertion, in whole or in part, the allowable portion of any apportionment payment that was withheld shall be paid at the next principal apportionment.

(e) (1) As used in this section, “audit or review” means an audit conducted by the Controller’s office, an annual audit conducted by a certified public accountant or a public accounting firm pursuant to Section 41020, and an audit or review conducted by a governmental agency that provided the local educational agency with an opportunity to provide a written response.

(2) As used in this section, “local educational agency” includes a charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 19, Sec. 39.   (SB 78)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

41344.1.

(a) The Education Audit Appeals Panel is hereby established as a separate state agency. Its membership shall consist of the Superintendent, the Director of Finance, and the Chief Executive Officer of the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team established pursuant to Section 42127.8 or their designees. The panel shall have the authority to expend funds, hire staff, make contracts, sue and be sued, and issue regulations in furtherance of its duties.

(b) The panel shall hear appeals filed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 41344. The Controller and the Department of Finance shall be a party to all appeals. The department may, at its
 election, timely intervene as a party in any appeal. The panel shall consider audit appeals pursuant to the administrative adjudication provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except that it may adopt regulations specifying special pleadings that shall govern audit appeals. The panel may approve settlements and make findings of fact and interpretations of law.

(c) Compliance with all legal requirements is a condition to the state’s obligation to make apportionments. A condition may be deemed satisfied if the panel finds there has been compliance or substantial compliance with all legal requirements. “Substantial compliance” means nearly complete satisfaction of all material requirements of a funding program that provide an educational benefit substantially consistent with the program’s
 purpose. A minor or inadvertent noncompliance may be grounds for a finding of substantial compliance provided that the local educational agency can demonstrate it acted in good faith to comply with the conditions established in law or regulation necessary for apportionment of funding. The panel may further define “substantial compliance” by issuing regulations or through adjudicative opinions, or both. If the panel finds there has been substantial compliance, the panel may waive or reduce the reimbursement or penalty amount and may also order other remedial measures sufficient to induce full compliance in the future. Other remedial measures may include restoration of a reduction or penalty amount if full compliance is not rendered in the future, ordering special audits, and requiring special training.

(d) In addition to the normal appeal process specified above, there is hereby created a voluntary, informal, summary appeals process for
 noncompliant audit exceptions that clearly constitute substantial compliance as that term is defined in subdivision (c).
 The summary appeals process shall adhere to all of the following:

(1) Requests for summary review shall be made to the executive officer of the panel who may seek comment from the Department of Finance or Superintendent. Summary review shall be sought within 30 days of the date on which a local educational agency receives a final audit report resulting from an audit or review.

(2) If
 the executive officer concludes the conditions for finding substantial compliance are not clearly met or involve substantial questions of fact, the executive officer may deny the request for summary review and the appellant may pursue its claim through the normal appeal process.

(3) For appeals in which the total audit exceptions for full repayment or penalty constitute less than 150 units of average daily attendance or the equivalent value of 150 units of
 average daily attendance, as calculated pursuant to the statewide average local control funding formula rate pursuant to subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) of Section 42238.02 for the corresponding audit year and posted on the department’s internet website, whichever is less, the executive officer may waive or reduce the reimbursement or penalty upon a finding of substantial compliance and that other remedial measures are sufficient to induce full compliance in the future.

(4) For appeals in which the total audit exceptions for full repayment or penalty meet or exceed 150 units of average daily attendance or
 the equivalent value of 150 units of average daily attendance, as calculated pursuant to the statewide average local control funding formula rate pursuant to subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) of Section 42238.02 for the corresponding audit year and posted on the department’s internet website, whichever is greater, the executive officer may waive or reduce the reimbursement or penalty upon a finding of substantial compliance and order other remedial measures that are sufficient to induce full compliance in the future, if the executive officer has the written approval of the Department of Finance and the Superintendent. The executive officer shall provide the details of the proposed settlement and the rationale in writing to the Department of Finance and Superintendent and allow at least 30 days for their review.

(5) The right to appeal pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 41344 is independent of this subdivision and an appellant may pursue the appellant’s appeal under subdivision (b) regardless of the result under this subdivision. A local educational agency that has unresolved audit appeals pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 41344 pending on January 1, 2003, may file a request for summary review under this subdivision for a period of 60 days after January 1, 2003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 19.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

41344.2.

Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 41344 or any other provision of law, the State Board of Education may consider and act upon requests to retroactively waive any provision of this code or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education that is the basis of an apportionment significant audit if the request was received in writing by the State Department of Education prior to July 7, 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 15.6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

41344.3.

Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 41344 or any other provision of law, the State Board of Education may, upon a finding that violations were minor or inadvertent and the intent of Section 60119 was substantially met, consider and act upon requests to waive Section 60119 to the extent that a failure to comply with that section would otherwise subject the school district to a repayment due to an apportionment significant audit. The board may act on requests to waive Section 60119 regardless of whether the request was received before or after the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective October 7, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

41344.4.

Notwithstanding any other law, a local educational agency shall not be required to repay an apportionment based on a significant audit exception related to the requirements specified in
subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 14501 if the county superintendent of schools certifies to the Superintendent and the Controller that the audit exception was corrected by the local educational agency or that an acceptable plan of correction was submitted to the county superintendent of schools pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (l) of Section 41020. With respect to textbooks and instructional materials, the plan shall be consistent with the requirements of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of
 Section 60119.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 49.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

41344.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 17456, 17457, 17462, and 17463, or any other law, from June 1, 2004, to June 30, 2015, inclusive, the Vallejo City Unified School District may sell property owned by the district and use the proceeds from the sale to reduce or retire the emergency loan provided in Section 9 of Chapter 53 of the Statutes of 2004. The sale only of property pursuant to this subdivision is not subject to Section 17459 or 17464.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, from June 1, 2004, to June 30, 2015, inclusive, the Vallejo City Unified School District is not eligible for hardship assistance pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 17075.10) of Chapter 12.5 of Part 10 of
 Division 1 of Title 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 147, Sec. 1.   (AB 1874)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Child Nutrition Allowances [41352. - 41353.]

41352.

(a) With the exception of those who receive reimbursement for meals only from the state, the State Department of Education shall make allowances to school food authorities and child care food program sponsors for the Child Nutrition Program on a monthly basis. Program providers shall submit claims to the department within 10 calendar days of the end of each month. Claims submitted after 60 calendar days or more from the end of the period for which reimbursement is claimed shall be invalid. Within 45 calendar days of submission of a valid claim, the State Department of Education shall tender reimbursement.
